Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
ARTICLE 10
COMMUNITY LIVING

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2013. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 OFFICE OF COMMUNITY LIVING

PART 2 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES

PART 3 FAMILY SUPPORT SERVICES

PART 4 COLORADO FAMILY SUPPORT LOAN FUND